Florida, session 2026, HB327.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section
381.9312, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
381.9312 Uterine fibroid research database; education and
public awareness.—
(2) UTERINE FIBROID RESEARCH DATABASE.—
(c) The database may not include any personal identifying
information of women diagnosed with or treated for uterine
fibroids.
Section 2. This act shall take effect on the same date
that HB 1515 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb327 -01-er